src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-78saama_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `saama: # Verb (78) `saama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     saama+V+Inf/mA: saama
     saama+V+Inf: saiaq
     saama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: saanuq
     saama+V+Pss+PrfPrc: saad

     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saa
     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: saat
     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saa
     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: saamiq
     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: saatiq
     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: saavaq
     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sai
     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sait
     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sai
     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: saimiq
     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: saitiq
     saama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: saiq
     saama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: saa

     saama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saia
     saama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saias

     saama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: saava

     saama+V+Jus: saaguq
